Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5445.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1002. A judge elected, appointed, or assigned to the family division of circuit court has the same power and authority as a circuit court judge in the same jurisdiction. Sec. 1003. (1) Each judicial circuit shall have a family division of circuit court. (2) Each judicial circuit with more than 1 circuit court judge shall have at least 1 judgeship permanently assigned to the family division of circuit court. The number of judgeships assigned to a family division of circuit court must allow for proper caseloads for judges as determined by a case weight study conducted by the supreme court. (3) A circuit court or probate court judgeship existing as of January 1, 2028 may be assigned as a permanent family division of circuit court judgeship in accordance with the approved family court plan. If a judgeship is assigned to the family division of circuit court, the judgeship may only be reassigned with the approval of an updated family court plan that reduces the number of judgeships assigned to the family division of circuit court. (4) If a judgeship is assigned to the family division of circuit court under subsection (3), the family court plan created under section 1011 must reflect that assignment and the judge currently sitting in that judgeship shall decide to be 1 of the following: (a) Temporarily assigned to the family division of circuit court in accordance with subsection (5). (b) Permanently assigned to the family division of circuit court in accordance with subsection (6). (5) A judge who serves temporarily under this subsection has the powers and shall perform all of the duties of a permanent judge of the family division of circuit court. A judge who requests to be temporarily assigned to the family division of circuit court may transfer out of the family division of circuit court if a judgeship in the same jurisdiction that is not assigned to the family division of circuit court becomes available. After the temporary judge transfers out, the seat is a permanent family division of circuit court seat and must be designated as such for an appointment by the governor and on the ballot. If a judge under this subsection who transfers to another judgeship in the same jurisdiction has had substantial involvement in a case, whether or not the trial or a hearing has begun, that judge may keep the matter upon request of a party or by agreement of both of the judges involved until its conclusion and enter judgment or a final order. (6) A judge who as of January 1, 2028 has a caseload of greater than 50% family cases may request to be designated as a permanent family division of circuit court judge in the court's family court plan, and the designation attaches to that judgeship permanently. A judge who requests a permanent family division of circuit court designation may vacate a current judgeship and run for a different judicial seat but cannot transfer to another judgeship. This subsection does not prevent a judge from temporarily providing coverage for another judge by assignment outside of the family division of circuit court in response to an urgent need for that assignment. (7) An individual who runs for a judgeship assigned to the family division of circuit court must be nominated and elected under chapter XIX of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.411 to 168.426. (8) If a judicial circuit has more than 1 assigned judge of the family division of circuit court, the supreme court shall appoint a chief judge of the family division of circuit court from judges who are permanently assigned to the family division of circuit court. The chief judge of the family division of circuit court is primarily responsible for all administrative matters within the family division of circuit court. Sec. 1011. (1) Not later than July 1, 2003, in each judicial circuit, the chief circuit judge and the chief probate judge or judges shall enter into an agreement that establishes a plan known as the "family court plan" that details how the family division will be operated in that circuit and how the services of the agencies listed in section 1043 will be coordinated in order to promote more efficient and effective services to families and individuals. If a probate court district includes counties that are in different judicial circuits, the chief judge of each judicial circuit that includes a county in the probate court district and the chief probate judge shall enter into a family court plan for each circuit. (2) If, in any judicial circuit, the agreement required under subsection (1) is not entered into on or before July 1, 2003, the supreme court shall develop and implement the family court plan for that judicial circuit. (3) A family court plan required under subsection (1) shall provide that a judge's service pursuant to the family court plan be consistent with the goal of developing sufficient judicial expertise in family law to properly serve the interests of the families and children whose cases are assigned to that judge. The chief judge of the circuit court shall have the authority and flexibility to determine the duration of a judge's service pursuant to the family court plan in furtherance of this goal. (4) A judge serving pursuant to the family court plan shall receive appropriate training as required by the supreme court. (5) A family court plan required under subsection (1) may provide that when a judge's service pursuant to the family court plan ends, the pending cases of that judge are to be reassigned to another judge or judges serving pursuant to the family court plan or are to be resolved by that judge. (6) A family court plan required under subsection (1) shall specifically identify any probate judge serving pursuant to the family court plan. (7) A family court plan required under subsection (1) shall be reviewed and revised periodically, as necessary, by the chief circuit judge or judges and the chief probate judge or judges, and shall be submitted for approval by the supreme court. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, each circuit court must revise its family court plan to comply with this act. (2) If by April 1, 2028 a judicial circuit fails to come into compliance with an approved family court plan under this chapter, the supreme court shall develop and implement a family court plan for that circuit. (3) A family court plan required under subsection (1) must do all of the following: (a) Identify all judges who will serve in the family division of circuit court. (b) Indicate if each judge under subdivision (a) is permanently assigned or temporarily assigned under section 1003 until the seat is vacated. (c) Verify that all judges under subdivision (a) are trained in compliance with subsection (4). (d) Ensure that a judge's service under the family court plan encourages the judge to develop sufficient judicial expertise in family law to properly serve the interests of the families and children whose cases are assigned to that judge. (e) Require that matters in the family division of circuit court be heard in accordance with section 1023. (4) A judge serving under the family court plan shall have appropriate training. Judges elected, assigned, or appointed to the family division of circuit court shall certify to the family court plan review board in section 1012 that they have 1 of the following prior to presiding in the family division of circuit court: (a) At least 40 hours of family law training, 40 hours of children's law training, and 16 hours of domestic violence training. (b) If a judge cannot certify prior training under subdivision (a), the judge shall participate in the hours of training necessary to meet the requirements under section 1019, including at least 40 hours of family law training before hearing family law cases, 40 hours of children's law training before hearing child welfare cases, and 16 hours of domestic violence training before hearing any cases. (5) Referees serving in the family division of circuit court must have not less than 5 years of family law experience and children's law experience. If a referee is not experienced in both matters, the referee must receive at least 40 hours of training in the matter the referee is not experienced in before presiding over those matters. (6) All subsequent changes to an approved family court plan must be reviewed and approved by the supreme court. (7) The governor shall consider the education requirements of subsection (4) before appointing a family division of circuit court judge. Sec. 1012. The supreme court shall be responsible for all of the following: (a) Review the family court plans of each circuit court and ensure compliance with this chapter. (b) Require changes to a family court plan for compliance with this chapter. (c) Review changes to family court plans under subdivision (b), as necessary. Sec. 1021. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, the family division of circuit court has sole and exclusive jurisdiction over the following cases commenced on or after January 1, 1998:2028: (a) Cases of divorce and ancillary matters as set forth in the following statutes: (i) 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.1 to 551.18. (ii) 1921 PA 352, MCL 551.51. (iii) 1887 PA 128, MCL 551.101 to 551.111. (iv) 1897 PA 180, MCL 551.201 to 551.204. (v) 1919 PA 160, MCL 551.251. (vi) 1939 PA 168, MCL 551.271 to 551.272. (vii) The circuit court family counseling services act, 1964 PA 155, MCL 551.331 to 551.344. (viii) (i) 1846 RS 84, MCL 552.1 to 552.45. (ix) (ii) 1909 PA 259, MCL 552.101 to 552.104. (x) (iii) 1911 PA 52, MCL 552.121 to 552.123. (xi) (iv) 1913 PA 379, MCL 552.151 to 552.156. (v) The friend of the court act, 1982 PA 294, MCL 552.501 to 552.535. (xii) (vi) 1905 PA 299, MCL 552.391. (xiii) (vii) 1949 PA 42, MCL 552.401 to 552.402. (xiv) (viii) The family support act, 1966 PA 138, MCL 552.451 to 552.459. (xv) The friend of the court act, 1982 PA 294, MCL 552.501 to 552.535. (xvi) (ix) The support and parenting time enforcement act, 1982 PA 295, MCL 552.601 to 552.650. (xvii) (x) The interstate income withholding act, 1985 PA 216, MCL 552.671 to 552.685. (xviii) The uniform interstate family support act, 2015 PA 255, MCL 552.2101 to 552.2905. (b) Cases under the extreme risk protection order act, 2023 PA 38, MCL 691.1801 to 691.1821. (c) (b) Cases of adoption as provided in chapter X of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 710.21 to 710.70. (c) Cases involving certain children incapable of adoption under 1925 PA 271, MCL 722.531 to 722.534. (d) Cases involving a change of name as provided in chapter XI of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 711.1 to 711.3. (e) Cases involving the safe delivery of newborns law, chapter XII of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712.1 to 712.20. (f) (e) Cases involving juveniles as provided in under chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.1 to 712A.32. (g) Cases under the Michigan Indian family preservation act, chapter XIIB of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712B.1 to 712B.41. (h) (f) Cases involving the status of minors and the emancipation of minors under 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.1 to 722.6. (i) (g) Cases of child custody under the child custody act of 1970, 1970 PA 91, MCL 722.21 to 722.31. , and child custody jurisdiction as provided in the uniform child-custody jurisdiction and enforcement act, 2001 PA 195, MCL 722.1101 to 722.1406. (j) Cases with children incapable of adoption under 1925 PA 271, MCL 722.531 to 722.534. (k) Appeals from administrative hearings on central registry expungements under section 7j of the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.627j. (l) (h) Cases involving paternity and child support under the paternity act, 1956 PA 205, MCL 722.711 to 722.730. (m) (i) Cases involving parental consent for abortions performed on unemancipated minors under the parental rights restoration act, 1990 PA 211, MCL 722.901 to 722.908. (n) Cases under the acknowledgment of parentage act, 1996 PA 305, MCL 722.1001 to 722.1013. (o) Cases under the uniform child-custody jurisdiction and enforcement act, 2001 PA 195, MCL 722.1101 to 722.1406. (p) Cases under the revocation of paternity act, 2012 PA 159, MCL 722.1431 to 722.1445. (q) Cases under the summary support and paternity act, 2014 PA 366, MCL 722.1491 to 722.1503. (r) Cases under the uniform child abduction prevention act, 2014 PA 460, MCL 722.1521 to 722.1532. (s) (j) Cases involving child support under the revised uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act, 1952 PA 8, MCL 780.151 to 780.183. (t) (k) Cases involving domestic personal protection orders and foreign protection orders under sections 2950 to 2950m.2950o. (2) The family division of circuit court has ancillary jurisdiction over the following cases commenced on or after January 1, 1998: (u) (a) Cases where the family court exercises ancillary jurisdiction involving guardians and conservators of a minor as provided in article 5 V of the estates and protected individuals code, 1998 PA 386, MCL 700.5101 to 700.5520. (b) Cases involving treatment of, or guardianship of, mentally ill or developmentally disabled persons under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106. (v) Cases under the assisted reproduction and surrogacy parentage act, 2024 PA 24, MCL 722.1701 to 722.1909. (2) (3) A probate judge identified in section 1011 as serving pursuant to under the family court plan has the same power and authority, within the county or probate court district in which he or she the probate judge serves, as probate judge, as that of a circuit judge over cases described in subsection (1), in addition to all the power and authority of a judge of the probate court. Sec. 1023. Cases in the family division of circuit court must be assigned to a judge and referee team by family. When 2 or more matters within the jurisdiction of the family division of circuit court involving members of the same immediate family are pending in the same judicial circuit, those matters , whenever practicable, shall must be assigned to the judge and referee team to whom the first such case was assigned. As used in this section, "immediate family" means spouse, parent, child, or sibling relationships.